Washington statutes.
RCW 27.18.040

Compliance with tax and bonding laws enjoined.

No regional library, county library, rural county library district library, island library district library, intercounty rural library district library, or city library of this state shall be a party to a library agreement which provides for the construction or maintenance of a library pursuant to Article III, subdivision (c-7) of the compact, nor levy a tax or issue bonds to contribute to the construction or maintenance of such a library, except after compliance with any laws applicable to regional libraries, county libraries, rural county library district libraries, island library district libraries, intercounty rural library district libraries, or city libraries relating to or governing the levying of taxes or the issuance of bonds.

[ 1982 c 123 s 18; 1965 ex.s. c 93 s 4.]